Massachusetts, session 194th, S667.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1.  Chapter 21A of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official 
Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after section 5 the following section:- 
SECTION 5A.  Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the secretary 
or an appointee shall, in conjunction with the special waterfront development oversight 
commission, comment on and approve proposals for development in Designated Port Authorities 
that do not meet strict compliance with said requirements in chapter 21A or 91.    
SECTION 2.  There shall be established a special waterfront development oversight 
commission to comment on and approve all requests from municipalities for proposals to 
develop and build in Designated Port Areas.   

of 2 10  The commission shall have 7 members.  The commission shall include: 1 member to be 
appointed by the governor,  1 member to be appointed by the secretary of energy and 
environmental affairs; 1 member to be appointed by the president of the senate for a term of 2 
years; 1 member to be appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives for a term of 2 
years; 1 member to be appointed by the senate minority leader, for a term of 2 years; and 1 
member to be appointed by the minority leader of the house of representatives. Each member of 
the commission shall be an expert with experience in the fields of environmental policy, public 
policy, municipal administration, or economic development. One of the members shall be 
appointed by the governor to serve as chairperson of the commission. 
The commission shall develop criteria for applicants to seek alternative compliance with 
the laws and regulations governing Designated Port Authorities.  Said regulations shall not allow 
for the approval of any project that in the opinion of the commission undermines the integrity of 
our environment.  Any project approved by the commission shall be submitted to the clerks of 
the House of Representatives and the Senate and the chairs of ranking members of the joint 
committee on municipalities and regional government.  Said project shall not commence without 
approval from the general court.